California statutes. Education Code
  PART 10.8. SCHOOLBUS EMISSIONS REDUCTION FUNDS [17920. - 17927.]

17920.

Any school district or county office of education may establish and administer a schoolbus emissions reduction fund to receive revenue from public and private sources for the purpose of purchasing low- or zero-emission schoolbuses to replace, or increase the number of, schoolbuses in the existing school district or county fleet or retrofitting existing schoolbuses to achieve reductions in emissions.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 862, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

17921.

A school district or county office of education that establishes a schoolbus emissions reduction fund may receive revenues from air pollution control district and air quality management district grants, revenues from a city that are granted pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 44243 of the Health and Safety Code, or from any other source. The school district or county office of education shall contribute a majority of the money deposited in its schoolbus emissions reduction fund.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 862, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

17922.

State funds may, upon appropriation by the Legislature, be distributed to the Superintendent of Public Instruction for distribution to districts and county offices of education for the purchase of low- or zero-emission schoolbuses that replace, or increase the number of, schoolbuses in the existing schoolbus fleet or for retrofitting existing schoolbuses to achieve reductions in emissions. State funds that are provided pursuant to this part shall not exceed the amount of funds provided from other sources.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 862, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

17923.

A school district or county office of education may enter into contracts, including multiple year contracts, with private sector individuals, businesses, and other entities for the purpose of receiving revenues to supplement its schoolbus emissions reduction fund in exchange for the issuance to the private sector contributor of emission reduction credits resulting from the purchase by the school district or county office of education of low- or zero-emission schoolbuses or the retrofit of existing schoolbuses. If there are multiple private sector contributors, each of those contributors shall receive a share of the credits allocated in proportion to their contribution, as specified by the school district or county office of education at the time that the parties enter into the agreement.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 862, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

17924.

The Chairperson of the State Air Resources Board and the Superintendent of Public Instruction shall jointly develop guidelines for school district or county office of education use that describe all of the following:

(a) The manner in which school districts or county offices of education may obtain funding from private and public entities for deposit into a school district or county office of education schoolbus emissions reduction fund.

(b) The methods for determining the quantity and allocation of emission reduction credits generated from a new bus that replaces an existing bus or from a new or retrofitted bus that represents an expansion of fleet capacity.

(c) The methods by which school districts or county offices of education located in the South Coast Air Quality Management District may obtain funds from cities pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 44243 of the Health and Safety Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 862, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

17925.

Prior to distributing any state funds pursuant to this part, the Superintendent of Public Instruction shall consult with the State Energy Resources Conservation and Development Commission to avoid duplication or overlap with appropriations from the Katz Schoolbus Fund, created pursuant to Section 17911.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 862, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

17926.

Any schoolbus replaced pursuant to this part that meets the federal safety standards established in 1977 shall be offered for sale to school districts to replace schoolbuses that do not meet the federal safety standards, at a purchase price not to exceed the amount of the school district or county office of education’s contribution specified in Section 17921, plus appropriate administrative costs. This section shall not apply if the school district or county office of education certifies a continued need for the schoolbus being replaced.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 862, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

17927.

(a) Commencing January 1, 2035, 100 percent of all newly purchased or contracted schoolbuses of a local educational agency shall be zero-emission vehicles, where feasible.

(b) If a local educational agency determines that the purchase or contracting of a zero-emission schoolbus is not feasible due to both terrain and route constraints, the local educational agency may request a one-time extension for a term not to exceed five years, in order to meet the requirements in subdivision (a), provided that both of the following conditions are met:

(1) The local educational agency can reasonably demonstrate that a
 daily planned bus route for transporting pupils to and from school cannot be serviced through available zero-emission technology in 2035.

(2) The State Air Resources Board, in consultation with the department and the State Energy Resources Conservation and Development Commission, receives and evaluates a local educational agency’s request, and grants a one-time extension based on the local educational agency reasonably demonstrating the condition in paragraph (1).

(c) Commencing January 1, 2040, if a frontier local educational agency determines that the purchase or contracting
 of a zero-emission schoolbus is not feasible due to both terrain and route constraints, the frontier local educational agency may request annual extensions, with the last extension expiring on January 1, 2045, in order to meet the requirements in subdivision (a), provided that both of the following conditions are met:

(1) The frontier local educational agency can reasonably demonstrate that a daily planned bus route for transporting pupils to and from school cannot be serviced
 through available zero-emission technology in the period in which the annual waiver is sought.

(2) The State Air Resources Board, in consultation with the department and the State Energy Resources Conservation and Development Commission, receives and evaluates the frontier local educational agency’s request, and grants an annual extension based on the frontier local educational agency reasonably demonstrating the condition in paragraph (1).

(d) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Frontier local educational agency” means a local educational agency that meets either of the following conditions:

(A) The total number of pupils in average daily attendance at all of the schools served by the local educational agency is
 fewer than 600.

(B) Each county in which a school operated by the local educational agency is located has a total population density fewer than 10 persons per square mile.

(2) “Local educational agency” means a school district, county office of education, or charter school.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 445, Sec. 2.   (AB 579)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------



  PART 11. LIBRARIES [18010. - 20092.]



  CHAPTER 1.5. Public Library Finance [18010. - 18032.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [18010. - 18013.]

18010.

The Legislature finds and declares that it is in the interest of the people and of the state that there be a general diffusion of information and knowledge through the continued operation of free public libraries. Such diffusion is a matter of general concern inasmuch as it is the duty of the state to provide encouragement to the voluntary lifelong learning of the people of the state.

The Legislature further declares that the public library is a supplement to the formal system of free public education, and a source of information and inspiration to persons of all ages, cultural backgrounds, and economic statuses, and a resource for continuing education and reeducation beyond the years of formal education, and as such deserves adequate financial support from government at all levels.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1498, Sec. 1.   Section operative July 1, 1983, pursuant to Section 18031.)
-------------------------------------------

18011.

It is the intent of the Legislature under this chapter to initiate and examine a specific program providing equitable and adequate funds to the public libraries of the state which are established under various provisions of law, and which, historically dependent for their support on local property tax revenues, face a fiscal crisis as a result of ad valorem tax limitations imposed by Article XIIIA of the California Constitution, which fiscal crisis has not been sufficiently resolved through application of existing statutes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1498, Sec. 1.   Section operative July 1, 1983, pursuant to Section 18031.)
-------------------------------------------

18012.

In adopting this chapter, the Legislature declares that its policy, and its objective in enacting the specific program prescribed in Section 18011, is to do all of the following:

(a) Assure the availability to every resident of the state of an adequate level of public library service regardless of the taxable wealth of the local jurisdiction providing the service.

(b) Provide permanent, stable, and predictable financing for public libraries of the state through a combination of state and local revenues.

(c) Provide state funds for public library service through application of a simple formula whose variable elements can be readily predicted and ascertained by both state and local officials, and which can be administered by the Controller and the State Librarian as ministerial functions.

(d) Reaffirm the principle of local control of the government and administration of public libraries under broad state policy determinations, and subject to the necessity for financial accounting to the state for the expenditure of state funds and required local matching funds.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1498, Sec. 1.   Section operative July 1, 1983, pursuant to Section 18031.)
-------------------------------------------

18013.

The Legislature finds and declares that this chapter effects a state policy that each public library provide a minimum level of service, known as the foundation program, to the extent state funds are made available for that purpose as prescribed by this chapter. The Legislature, therefore, declares that state funds made available to each public library pursuant to this chapter, to the extent those funds are appropriations subject to limitation of a public library, shall be included in the appropriations limit of the state for purposes of Article XIIIB of the California Constitution. However, this chapter does not mandate any new program or higher level of service on any local government for which state funds are not made available as prescribed by this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1498, Sec. 1.   Section operative July 1, 1983, pursuant to Section 18031.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Definitions [18015. - 18015.]

18015.

As used in this chapter:

(a) “Public library” means a library, or two or more libraries, operated as a single entity by one or more public jurisdictions and which serve the general public without distinction.

(b) “Foundation program” means those elements of library service which are basic to its function as a provider of information, education, and cultural enrichment to all segments of the community, including, but not limited to, collection development and maintenance, lending services, information services, facility maintenance, and administration. The foundation program shall not include major capital improvements, which, for purposes of this chapter, shall be defined as the purchase of real property, the construction or improvement of buildings, and the purchase of equipment and the payment of fees or other costs in connection with the same.

(c) “Fiscal officer” means, for a municipal library, the chief fiscal officer of the municipality; for a county library or a library district under the jurisdiction of the county board of supervisors, the chief fiscal officer of the county; and for an independent library district, the chief librarian of the district. In the case of a public library which provides foundation program service by contract to one or more jurisdictions in addition to the jurisdiction or jurisdictions with which it is affiliated, the chief fiscal officer of the jurisdiction with which it is primarily affiliated shall be deemed the fiscal officer for the public library for the purposes of this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 895, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Funding [18020. - 18026.]

18020.

For the fiscal year 1982–83, the cost of the foundation program is deemed to be twelve dollars ($12) per capita.

For the 1983–84 fiscal year and each fiscal year thereafter, the cost of the foundation program shall be increased by a percentage equal to the average statewide percentage increase in the total revenue limit for all unified school districts computed pursuant to Section 42238 from the prior fiscal year.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1498, Sec. 1.   Section operative July 1, 1983, pursuant to Section 18031.)
-------------------------------------------

18021.

The State Librarian shall determine and certify, on or before June 1, 1982, and June 1 of each fiscal year thereafter, the population served by each public library of the state based upon census data compiled by the United States Department of Commerce or estimates prepared by the California Department of Finance, whichever is more current. For such purposes, no person shall be deemed to be served by more than one public library.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1498, Sec. 1.   Section operative July 1, 1983, pursuant to Section 18031.)
-------------------------------------------

18022.

The total cost of the foundation program for each public library for the purposes of this chapter shall be the product of the per capita cost determined pursuant to Section 18020 multiplied by the population determined pursuant to Section 18021.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1498, Sec. 1.   Section operative July 1, 1983, pursuant to Section 18031.)
-------------------------------------------

18023.

On or before August 31, 1982, and October 31 of each fiscal year thereafter, the fiscal officer of each public library shall report to the State Librarian the total revenue appropriated for the foundation program of the public library for that fiscal year and shall specify the amount of local revenue included in such total appropriation. For the purposes of this chapter, homeowner and business inventory exemption reimbursements, timber yield tax funds, and federal revenue sharing funds shall be deemed to be local revenues.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 831, Sec. 1.   Effective August 31, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

18024.

(a) A fund is hereby created in the State Treasury to be known as the Public Library Fund.

(b) The Controller shall transfer on January 1, 1984, from the General Fund to the Public Library Fund the amount necessary to meet the state’s obligations under this chapter for the remainder of the 1983–84 fiscal year.

(c) The Controller shall transfer on July 1, 1984, and on July 1 of each year thereafter, from the General Fund to the Public Library Fund the amount necessary to meet the state’s obligation under this chapter for that particular fiscal year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 323, Sec. 9.   Effective July 1, 1983.)
-------------------------------------------

18025.

(a) For the 1982–83 fiscal year and each fiscal year thereafter, the State Librarian shall determine the amount to which each public library is entitled for support of the library during the fiscal year. The amount shall be equal to 10 percent of the cost of the foundation program as determined pursuant to Section 18022.

(b) If local revenues appropriated for a public library for the 1982–83 fiscal year and each fiscal year thereafter, including tax revenues made available under Chapter 282 of the Statutes of 1979, total less than 90 percent of the cost of the foundation program as determined pursuant to Section 18022, the state allocation for that fiscal year shall be reduced proportionately. A proportional reduction in the state allocation as described in this subdivision shall not be made, however, commencing with the 1997–98 fiscal year and each fiscal year thereafter, if the amount appropriated to the Public Library Fund for that fiscal year is equal to or greater than the amount necessary to fund each public library in the amount it received for the prior fiscal year, thus providing the state’s share of the cost of the foundation program to each library based only on its population served, as certified by the State Librarian. After the first fiscal year in which the proportional reduction is not made, no further reductions based on this subdivision shall be made in any future fiscal year. It is the intent of this subdivision to make this change without harm to any library currently receiving an unreduced share of the state’s cost of the foundation program.

(c) If local revenues appropriated for a public library for the 1982–83 fiscal year and each fiscal year thereafter, including tax revenues made available under the provisions of Chapter 282 of the Statutes of 1979, total more than 90 percent of the cost of the foundation program as determined pursuant to Section 18022, the state allocation for that fiscal year shall remain at 10 percent of the cost of the foundation program as determined pursuant to Section 18022.

(d) In order for a public library to receive state funds under this chapter in the 1983–84 fiscal year and any fiscal year thereafter, the total amount of local revenues appropriated for the public library for that fiscal year, including tax revenues made available under Chapter 282 of the Statutes of 1979 and other revenues deemed to be local revenues according to Section 18023, shall be equal to at least the total amount of local revenues, as defined, appropriated for the public library in the previous fiscal year. State funds provided under this chapter shall supplement, but not supplant, local revenues appropriated for the public library.

(e) (1) Notwithstanding subdivision (d), or any other provision of law, in the 1993–94 fiscal year, any city, county, district, or city and county, that reduces local revenues appropriated for the public library for the 1993–94 fiscal year shall continue to receive state funds appropriated under this chapter for the 1993–94 fiscal year only, provided that the amount of the reduction to the appropriation to that public library for the 1993–94 fiscal year is no more than 20 percent of the 1992–93 fiscal year appropriation made to that public library as certified by the fiscal officer of the public library and transmitted to the State Librarian pursuant to Section 18023.

(2) Commencing with the 1993–94 fiscal year, and each fiscal year thereafter, any city, county, district, or city and county may request from the State Librarian a waiver of the requirements of subdivision (d) or of paragraph (1) by demonstrating that the percentage of the reduction in local revenues appropriated for the public library is no greater than the percentage of the reduction of local revenues received by the city, county, district, or city and county operating the public library as a result of changes made to Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 95) of Part 0.5 of the Revenue and Taxation Code by statutes enacted during or after the 1991–92 Regular Session having the effect of shifting property tax revenues from cities, counties, special districts, and redevelopment agencies to school districts and community colleges. Requests for the waiver and the substantiating documentation shall be submitted to the State Librarian along with the annual report of appropriation required by Section 18023 or any other report of appropriations applying to public libraries required by any other provision of law.

(3) Commencing with the 1997-98 fiscal year, and each fiscal year thereafter, any city, county, district, or city and county may request from the State Librarian a waiver of the requirements of subdivision (d) by demonstrating that the percentage of reduction in local revenues appropriated for the public library is no greater than the percentage of reduction of local revenues received by the city, county, district, or city and county operating the public library as a result of the addition of Article XIIID, otherwise known as the Right to Vote on Taxes Act, to the California Constitution as approved by the voters at the November 5, 1996, general election. Requests for the waiver and the substantiating documentation shall be submitted to the State Librarian along with the annual report of appropriation required by Section 18023 or any other report of appropriations applying to public libraries required by any other provision of law.

(4) Commencing with the 2000–01 fiscal year, and each fiscal year thereafter, any city, county, district, or city and county may request from the State Librarian a waiver of the requirements of subdivision (d) or of paragraph (1) by demonstrating that the reduction in local revenues appropriated for the public library is no greater than the reduction in local revenues received by the city, county, district, or city and county operating the public library as a result of the automatic termination of a locally approved special tax or benefit assessment for that public library. Requests for the waiver and substantiating documentation shall be submitted to the State Librarian along with the annual report of appropriation required by Section 18023 or any other report of appropriations applying to public libraries required by any other provision of law.

(f) If the state allocations computed pursuant to this section exceed the total amount of funds appropriated for purposes of this section in any fiscal year, the State Librarian shall adjust on a pro rata basis public library allocations prescribed by this section so that the total amount in each fiscal year does not exceed this amount.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 506, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

18026.

Commencing with the 1984–85 fiscal year, the State Librarian shall certify to the Controller on or before November 15, 1984, and on or before each November 15 thereafter, the amounts determined in Section 18025. The Controller shall distribute to the fiscal officer of each public library 100 percent of the amount certified by the State Librarian on or before January 15 of the 1984–85 fiscal year, and on or before each January 15 thereafter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 831, Sec. 3.   Effective August 31, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Services [18030. - 18032.]

18030.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, books and other library materials acquired or maintained by a public library as a part of the foundation program supported in part by state funds under this chapter shall be made available upon request to other public libraries in the state without charge, subject to any restrictions which may apply to the use of the materials by residents of the area normally served by the library.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1498, Sec. 1.   Section operative July 1, 1983, pursuant to Section 18031.)
-------------------------------------------

18030.5.

(a) Every public library that receives state funds pursuant to this chapter and that provides public access to the Internet shall, by a majority vote of the governing board, adopt a policy regarding access by minors to the Internet by January 1, 2000.

(b) Every public library that is required to adopt a policy pursuant to subdivision (a) shall make the policy available to members of the public at every library branch.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 429, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

18031.

The provisions of this chapter shall become operative July 1, 1983.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1498, Sec. 1.   Note: This section prescribes a delayed operative date (July 1, 1983) for Chapter 1.5, commencing with Section 18010.)
-------------------------------------------

18032.

(a) Every public library that receives state funds pursuant to this chapter and that provides public access to video recordings shall, by a majority vote of the governing board, adopt a policy regarding access by minors to video recordings by January 1, 2000.

(b) Every public library that is required to adopt a policy pursuant to subdivision (a) shall make that policy available to members of the public at every library branch.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 88, Sec. 21.   (AB 176)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. School Libraries [18100. - 18203.]



  ARTICLE 1. Establishment and Maintenance [18100. - 18104.]

18100.

The governing board of each school district shall provide school library services for the pupils and teachers of the district by establishing and maintaining school libraries or by contractual arrangements with another public agency.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1372, Sec. 153.)
-------------------------------------------

18101.

The State Board of Education shall adopt standards, rules and regulations for school library services.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1372, Sec. 154.)
-------------------------------------------

18102.

Libraries may be established and maintained under the control of the governing board of any school district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1372, Sec. 155.)
-------------------------------------------

18103.

The libraries shall be open to the use of the teachers and the pupils of the school district during the schoolday. In addition, the libraries may be open at other hours, including evenings and Saturdays, as the governing board may determine. Libraries open to serve students during evening and Saturday hours shall be under the supervision of certificated personnel. Certificated personnel employed to perform full-time services in an elementary, junior high, or high school during the regular schoolday, may supervise, but shall not without their consent be required to supervise, a school library on evenings or Saturdays. If a person agrees to supervise the school library during Saturday or evening hours, he or she shall be compensated in the amounts determined by the governing board of the district as indicated on the salary schedule.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1372, Sec. 156.)
-------------------------------------------

18104.

(a) It is in the interest of the state to authorize the Livermore Valley Joint Unified School District to enter into a joint-use arrangement with another public entity for operation of a joint-use library facility located on land, in close proximity to a schoolsite, owned by the school district or by another public agency.

(b) Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the Livermore Valley Joint Unified School District may enter into a contract with the county, the city, or other appropriate entity having responsibility for the provision of public library services, in which the district is located for the purpose of operating a joint-use library facility at a schoolsite owned by the district or at a site, within one mile of the schoolsite, owned by the school district, the county, the city, or other appropriate entity having responsibility for the provision of public library services in that area.

(c) The Livermore Valley Joint Unified School District may apply for the lease-purchase of a project that includes a library facility, funded entirely with local funds, which facility, if constructed, would be of sufficient size to accommodate the requirements of a joint-use library for which the district has entered into a contract, pursuant to subdivision (b).

(d) The contract specified in subdivision (b) shall contain at least all of the following:

(1) Agreement that the county, city, or other appropriate entity shall deposit with the school district an amount equal to the total cost of any space in the proposed library facility that is beyond the needs of the district, prior to the signing of the construction contract for the project. The deposit shall not be refundable, except to the extent that it may prove subsequently to be in excess of the actual total cost of the space that is beyond the needs of the district.

(2) Agreement between the district and the county, the city, or other appropriate entity regarding staffing, maintenance, materials acquisition, and other matters related to the administration and operating costs of the joint-use facility. The agreement shall provide that the school district shall not be responsible for any costs that are not related to the school use of the joint-use facility.

(3) Agreement between the district and the county, the city, or other appropriate entity regarding the procedure for amendment or termination of the contract, including the disposition of materials housed in the joint-use facility should termination of the contract occur.

(e) A joint-use facility constructed pursuant to this section shall comply with all requirements applicable to school facilities.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 1034, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Books [18110. - 18111.]

18110.

County boards of education may adopt lists of books and other library materials for districts not employing a superintendent of schools or a librarian for full time. The lists may be distributed to all school districts in a county for use in the selection of books and other library materials.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1372, Sec. 157.)
-------------------------------------------

18111.

The governing board of any school district may exclude from schools and school libraries all books, publications, or papers of a sectarian, partisan, or denominational character.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1372, Sec. 158.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Management [18120. - 18122.]

18120.

The governing board of a school district maintaining its own library or libraries may appoint a librarian or librarians to staff the libraries provided they qualify as librarians pursuant to Section 44868.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1372, Sec. 159.)
-------------------------------------------

18121.

The governing board of a school district is accountable for the proper care and preservation of the school libraries of the district, and may make all necessary rules and regulations not provided for by the State Board of Education, or the Superintendent of Public Instruction and not inconsistent therewith.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1372, Sec. 160.)
-------------------------------------------

18122.

The governing board of a school district shall, on or before August 31st, in each year, report to the State Department of Education on the condition of school libraries, for the year ending June 30th preceding. The report shall, in addition to other matters deemed expedient by the governing board or the librarians, contain the statistical and other information as is deemed desirable by the State Department of Education. For this purpose the State Department of Education may send to the several districts under its supervision, instructions or question blanks so as to obtain the material for a comparative study of library conditions in the state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1372, Sec. 161.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Affiliation With County and City Libraries [18130. - 18139.]

18130.

Whenever the county in which a district is situated maintains a county library, the governing board of any school district or community college district may agree with the proper authorities of the county to contract for the provision of school library services by the county library. Either the governing board of the school district or community college district or the governing body of the county library may initiate proceedings for the provision of library services for the schools of the district. Such agreements shall be reviewed annually by contracting parties.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

18131.

Notwithstanding any other section of this article to the contrary, school districts may purchase textbooks, reference books, periodicals, and other publications approved by any board authorized to adopt these materials in addition to those furnished by the county library.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1372, Sec. 163.)
-------------------------------------------

18132.

All funds transferred to a county library pursuant to this article shall be used by the county library only for: (a) the acquisition of books and other materials as are adopted by the body authorized to adopt courses of study for the school districts which have entered into an agreement for the provision of school library services by the county library, and (b) the care and distribution of the books and other materials to schools which are eligible to receive school library services from the county library.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1372, Sec. 164.)
-------------------------------------------

18133.

The county librarian may (a) at his discretion dispose of books and other materials no longer fit for service, and (b) with the approval of the county board of education dispose of any books or other materials no longer needed by the course of study.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

18134.

In any city conducting a public library owned and managed by the city, the governing board of any school district may enter into an arrangement with the governing body of the public library of the city similar to the arrangement authorized by this article between the governing boards of any school district and the county library.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1372, Sec. 165.)
-------------------------------------------

18135.

Whenever an agreement is made that school library services will be provided by a city, or county library, the county, or city and county, or city superintendent of schools may draw a warrant for the whole amount stipulated in the agreement, payable to the proper authorities of the library, upon the filing with him of a copy of the resolution of the governing board of the district embodying the agreement made with the library. The copy shall be duly certified as correct by the clerk of the district or other proper officer.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

18136.

The governing board of any high school district lying wholly or partly within a county maintaining a county free library may enter into a contract or agreement with the board of supervisors of the county by which the high school district may secure the advantages of the county free library upon such terms and conditions as are fixed in the contract or agreement.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

18137.

Whenever the governing board of a school district enters into an agreement with a county or city library for school library services the district shall provide for the care and custody of and assume responsibility for the books and other property delivered to it subject to the rules and regulations of the county or city library and the terms of the agreement.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1372, Sec. 166.)
-------------------------------------------

18138.

With the consent of the county superintendent of schools the governing board of the school district may agree with the proper authorities of the county or city to terminate the affiliation of the district with the county or city library. Either the governing board of the school district or the governing body of the county library may initiate termination proceedings. The proceedings shall be terminated prior to the first day of February of the school year in which begun and may provide for either of the following:

(a) The complete withdrawal of affiliation effective on the first day of July next succeeding.

(b) A gradual withdrawal over a period of not to exceed three years beginning on the first day of July next succeeding the termination of proceedings.

The governing board of the school district shall enter into a written agreement with the proper authorities of the city or county providing for the terms of the gradual withdrawal, including the period to be covered, not to exceed three years, the amount of payment for each year, and the amount of service to be rendered.

Unless otherwise provided in the withdrawal agreement, the books purchased by a district during the period of the withdrawal become the property of the district.

All books purchased by a district shall be approved by the body authorized to adopt courses of study for the school districts of the county.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1372, Sec. 167.)
-------------------------------------------

18139.

With the consent of the county board of education, in those counties in which the county superintendent of schools performs library services for the school library of any district, the governing board of the school district may agree with the proper authorities of the county to terminate the affiliation of the district with the county superintendent of schools with respect to library services. The proceedings shall be terminated prior to the first day of February of the school year in which begun and may provide for either of the following:

(a) The complete withdrawal of affiliation effective on the first day of July next succeeding.

(b) A gradual withdrawal over a period of not to exceed five years beginning on the first day of July next succeeding the termination of proceedings.

The county board of education shall adopt rules and regulations governing a gradual withdrawal, including the period to be covered, not to exceed five years, the amount of payment for each year, and the amount of service to be rendered. The terms of the gradual withdrawal shall comply with the rules and regulations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1372, Sec. 168.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Use of Library Fund [18170. - 18172.]

18170.
